Utah statutes.
64-13d-102.   Definitions.
(1)  As used in this chapter:
(a)  "Contractor" means a private entity seeking to contract with or currently
contracting with the department to establish or operate a private correctional
facility.
(b)  "Correctional services" means those services necessary for the operation
of a correctional facility, including the provision of food, clothing,
security, programs, and health care.
(c)  "Facility" means a private correctional facility established or operated
under a contract with the department.
(2)  The definitions used under Section 64-13-1 apply to this chapter.
